Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.005

Finding.

The legislature finds that, given the overlap of powers and products in the companies regulated, the consolidation of the agencies regulating financial institutions and securities into one department will better serve the public interest through more effective use of staff expertise. Therefore, for the convenience of administration and the centralization of control and the more effective use of state resources and expertise, the state desires to combine the regulation of financial institutions and securities into one department.

[ 1993 c 472 s 1.]